Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 39 Robbery

11-39-1.
Penalty for robbery.

Every person who shall commit: (1) robbery by use of a dangerous weapon; (2) robbery where a victim is injured; or (3) robbery where the victim is a person who is severely impaired or an elderly person; shall be guilty of first degree robbery and shall be imprisoned for not less than ten (10) years and may be imprisoned for life, or fined not more than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000), or both.

Every person who shall commit robbery or other larceny from the person by force or threat, where there is no weapon and no injury and the victim is neither a severely impaired person or an elderly person, shall be guilty of second degree robbery and shall be imprisoned for not less than five (5) years nor more than thirty (30) years, or fined not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or both.

For the purposes of this section:

“Person who is severely impaired” has the same definition as provided in §

11-5-11

; and

“Elderly person” means a person sixty (60) years of age or older.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 277, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 343, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 395, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 606, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

11-39-1

; P.L. 1980, ch. 94, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 201, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 153, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 15; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 15.

11-39-2.
Robbery of the owner, lessor, or occupant of a motor vehicle.

Every person who shall unlawfully seize a motor vehicle from its lawful owner, lessor, or occupant by use or threat of use of a dangerous weapon against the owner, lessor, or occupant resulting in serious bodily injury, as defined in §

11-5-10.2

, shall be guilty of first degree robbery and shall be imprisoned for not less than ten (10) years and may be imprisoned for life, or fined not more than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000), or both. In all such cases, the justice imposing sentence shall impose a minimum sentence of ten (10) years imprisonment and may only impose a sentence less than the minimum if he or she finds that substantial and compelling circumstances exist which justify imposition of the alternative sentence. That finding may be based upon the character and background of the defendant, the cooperation of the defendant with law enforcement authorities, the nature and circumstances of the offense, and/or the nature and quality of the evidence presented at trial. If a sentence which is less than imprisonment for a term of ten (10) years is imposed, the trial justice shall set forth on the record the circumstances which he or she found as justification for imposition of the lesser sentence. A person sentenced to prison for violation of this subsection shall not be eligible for parole until at least one-half (1/2) of the sentence has been served in prison.

Every person who shall unlawfully seize a motor vehicle from its lawful owner, lessor, or occupant by force or threat of force against the owner, lessor, or occupant shall be guilty of second degree robbery and shall be imprisoned for not less than five (5) years nor more than thirty (30) years, or fined not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or both.

Every person who shall commit robbery of a motor vehicle by seizing it from its lawful owner, lessor, or occupant under the circumstances set forth in subsection (a) or (b) of this section, resulting in the death of the owner, lessor or occupant, shall be guilty of first degree murder and shall be sentenced to life imprisonment, and may be sentenced to life imprisonment without parole if ordered by the court pursuant to chapter 19.2 of title 12. A person sentenced to life imprisonment for violation of this subsection shall not be eligible for parole until at least twenty (20) years of the sentence has been served in prison.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 177, § 1.